Massachusetts, session 194th, S1862.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 12 of chapter 32B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting at the end of the second paragraph the following 2 sentences:-
"Should a governmental agency enter into a trust or joint purchase agreement, a board and
steering committee shall be established, including members of the appropriate public authorities,
no less than 25 per cent of the members shall come from labor representatives elected from a list
of representatives nominated by the collective bargaining units and a retiree from one of the
governmental units appointed by the Retired State, County and Municipal Employees
Association of Massachusetts. All members will be considered voting members."
of 1